Missouri, session 2026, SB1456.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 506, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 506.600, to read as
follows:
506.600. 1. This section shall be known as the "Civil
Liberties Defense Act". The Missouri general assembly finds
that it shall be the public policy of this state to protect
its citizens from the application of foreign laws when the
application of a foreign law will result in the violation of
a right protected by the Constitution of Missouri and the
Constitution of the United States, including, but not
limited to, due process, freedom of religion, speech, or
press, and any right of privacy.
2. The Missouri general assembly fully recognizes the
right to contract freely under the laws of this state, and
also recognizes that this right may be reasonably and
rationally circumscribed under the state's interest to
protect and promote rights and privileges protected under
the Constitution of Missouri and the Constitution of the
United States including, but not limited to, due process,

SB 1456 2
freedom of religion, speech, or press, and any right of
privacy.
3. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Court", any court, board, administrative agency,
or other adjudicative or enforcement authority of this state;
(2) "Foreign law, legal code, or system", any law,
legal code, or system of a jurisdiction outside of any state
or territory of the United States including, but not limited
to, international organizations and tribunals, and applied
by that jurisdiction's courts, administrative bodies, or
other formal or informal tribunals;
(3) "Religious organization", any church, seminary,
synagogue, temple, mosque, religious order, religious
corporation, association, or society whose identity is
distinctive in terms of common religious creed, beliefs,
doctrines, practices, or rituals of any faith or
denomination, including any organization qualifying as a
church or religious organization under Section 501(c)(3) or
501(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
4. Any court, arbitration, tribunal, or administrative
agency ruling or decision shall violate the public policy of
this state and be void and unenforceable if the court,
arbitration, tribunal, or administrative agency bases its
rulings or decisions in the matter at issue in whole or in
part on any foreign law, legal code, or system that is
repugnant or inconsistent with the Constitution of Missouri
and the Constitution of the United States.
5. A contract or contractual provisions, if capable of
segregation, which provides for the choice of a law, legal
code, or system to govern some or all of the disputes
between the parties adjudicated by a court of law or by an
arbitration panel arising from the contract mutually agreed

SB 1456 3
upon shall violate the public policy of this state and be
void and unenforceable if the foreign law, legal code, or
system chosen includes or incorporates any substantive or
procedural law, as applied to the dispute at issue, that is
repugnant or inconsistent with the Constitution of Missouri
and the Constitution of the United States.
6. (1) A contract or contractual provisions, if
capable of segregation, which provides for a jurisdiction
for purposes of granting the courts or arbitration panels in
personam jurisdiction over the parties to adjudicate any
disputes between parties arising from the contract mutually
agreed upon shall violate the public policy of this state
and be void and unenforceable if the jurisdiction chosen
includes any foreign law, legal code, or system, as applied
to the dispute at issue, that is repugnant or inconsistent
with the Constitution of Missouri and the Constitution of
the United States.
(2) If a resident of this state, subject to personal
jurisdiction in this state, seeks to maintain litigation,
arbitration, agency, or similarly binding proceedings in
this state and if the courts of this state find that
granting a claim of forum non conveniens or a related claim
violates or would likely violate rights protected under the
Constitution of Missouri and the Constitution of the United
States of the nonclaimant in the foreign forum with respect
to the matter in dispute, then it is the public policy of
this state that the claim shall be denied.
7. Without prejudice to any legal right, this section
shall not apply to a corporation, partnership, limited
liability company, business association, or other legal
entity that contracts to subject itself to foreign law in a
jurisdiction other than this state or the United States.

SB 1456 4
8. No court or arbitrator shall interpret this section
to limit the right of any person to the free exercise of
religion as guaranteed by the First Amendment to the
Constitution of the United States and by the Constitution of
Missouri. No court shall interpret this section to require
or authorize any court to adjudicate or prohibit any
religious organization from adjudicating ecclesiastical
matters including, but not limited to, the election,
appointment, calling, dismissal, removal, or excommunication
of a member, officer, official, priest, nun, monk, pastor,
rabbi, imam, or member of the clergy of the religious
organization or determination or interpretation of the
doctrine of the religious organization where adjudication by
a court would violate the constitution of this state or the
prohibition of the Establishment Clause of the First
Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.
9. This section shall not be interpreted by any court
to conflict with any federal treaty or other international
agreement to which the United States is a party to the
100 extent that such treaty or international agreement preempts
101 or is superior to state law on the matter at issue.
✓